Washington statutes.
RCW 10.61.006

Other cases—Included offenses.

In all other cases the defendant may be found guilty of an offense the commission of which is necessarily included within that with which he or she is charged in the indictment or information.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1055; 1891 c 28 s 76; Code 1881 s 1098; 1854 p 120 s 123; RRS s 2168. Formerly RCW 10.61.010, part.] [SLC-RO-11]